Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that protecting public health and the safety of municipal and private drinking water supplies is a fundamental responsibility of the state. In 2024 and 2025, groundwater monitoring conducted by Lewis county, the city of Centralia, and the department of fish and wildlife identified nitrate concentrations in multiple private drinking water wells in the Fords Prairie area that exceeded the federal maximum contaminant level for nitrates. Subsequent investigation, including the Bob Oke game farm groundwater investigation completed in November 2025, confirmed that manure generated by pheasants at the Bob Oke game farm contributes to nitrate loading in the underlying aquifer serving residential and municipal water users.(2) The legislature further finds that the Bob Oke game farm is located over a highly productive and hydrologically sensitive aquifer system that flows toward residential and municipal water supply areas. While the department of fish and wildlife has taken steps to reduce nutrient loading and has committed to voluntary participation in the department of ecology's concentrated animal feeding operation permitting program, the legislature finds that continued operation at the current site presents an ongoing risk of future impacts to drinking water supplies that cannot be fully mitigated through best management practices alone.(3) The legislature therefore declares that it is in the public interest to move the Bob Oke game farm to an alternate location where pheasant rearing and associated operations can be conducted without risk of contaminating municipal or residential drinking water sources. The legislature intends to require the department of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the department of enterprise services, to identify a suitable alternate site within a swift and reasonable time frame, to develop a relocation plan that ensures continuity of wildlife management functions, and to commence the orderly wind down of operations at the current site.(4) It is further the intent of the legislature to ensure that the existing site is remediated to protect groundwater quality, to prevent further nitrate loading to the aquifer, and to restore the property for future use consistent with the protection of public water supplies and surrounding communities. The legislature intends that state agencies model best practices for environmental stewardship, transparency, and accountability in managing public lands and facilities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(1) "Alternate location" means a site or sites identified for the relocation of pheasant rearing and associated operations that, based on hydrogeologic, land use, and water supply analyses, do not pose a material risk of contaminating municipal or residential drinking water supplies.(2) "Bob Oke game farm" means the pheasant rearing and release facility owned and operated by the department located in Lewis county near Centralia.(3) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.(4)(a) "Public water system" means any system providing water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances, including any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution facilities under control of the purveyor and used primarily in connection with the system. "Public water system" includes collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control of the purveyor but primarily used in connection with the system, including:(i) Any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under control of the purveyor and used primarily in connection with such system; and(ii) Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control of the purveyor which are primarily used in connection with such system.(b) "Public water system" excludes a system serving only one single-family residence and a system with four or fewer connections all of which serve residences on the same farm.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The department shall identify one or more alternate locations potentially suitable for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. The department shall first determine whether a property that the department currently owns or manages is suitable for relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. By December 1, 2026, the department shall report the list to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over the capital appropriations act and the senator and members of the house of representatives representing the legislative district in which the Bob Oke game farm is located.(2) To evaluate potential alternate locations, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act for predesign to:(a) Conduct or obtain a hydrogeologic assessment of each candidate site to evaluate the potential for nutrient, manure, or other operational impacts to groundwater, surface water, and municipal or residential drinking water supplies;(b) Evaluate proximity to existing public water systems, wellhead protection areas, and critical aquifer recharge areas;(c) Consider access, infrastructure needs, land availability, zoning and land use compatibility, and the ability to maintain wildlife management and release functions;(d) Consult with affected local governments, water utilities, tribes, and conservation districts; and(e) Estimate the cost, timeline, and logistical requirements for relocation to each candidate site.(3) At the conclusion of the predesign, the department shall submit a relocation report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. In addition to office of financial management predesign criteria, the report must include:(a) A summary of sites identified and evaluated and the criteria used;(b) A recommendation of a preferred location;(c) A proposed acquisition or leasing strategy;(d) A schedule for transition of operations;(e) Concept-level development plans;(f) Estimated capital and operating costs; and(g) Any statutory or budgetary actions required to complete the relocation.(4) Once a preferred location has been identified, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to relocate the Bob Oke game farm to the preferred location. The department shall continue to seek funding until the game farm has been relocated.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act to complete design work associated with the remediation of the existing location of the Bob Oke game farm. Design will include work to be done prior to closure and work to be done upon closure.(2) The remediation plan must include:(a) Continued groundwater and soil monitoring;(b) Measures to prevent further nitrate or nutrient leaching to groundwater; and(c) Evaluation of soil treatment, land cover, or other restoration techniques to reduce existing nutrient concentrations.(3) Once the design work associated with remediation of the existing location is complete, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to fully remediate the current site. The department shall continue to seek funding until the site has been fully remediated.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire June 30, 2033.--- END ---